Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 1. Uniform Conservation Easement Act.

Sec. 34.17.010.
Creation, conveyance, acceptance, and duration.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

34.17.010

—

34.17.060

, a conservation easement may be created, conveyed, recorded, assigned, released, modified, terminated, or otherwise altered or affected in the same manner as other easements.

A right or duty in favor of or against a holder and a right in favor of a person having a third-party right of enforcement may not arise under a conservation easement before the conservation easement is accepted by the holder and the acceptance is recorded.

Except as provided in AS

34.17.020(b)

, a conservation easement is unlimited in duration unless the instrument creating the conservation easement provides a limitation on duration.

An interest in real property in existence at the time a conservation easement is created is not impaired by the conservation easement unless the owner of the interest is a party to or consents to the conservation easement.

The state or a municipality may not establish a conservation easement on property by eminent domain.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008, under § 5, ch. 116, SLA 2008 “AS

34.17.010

—

34.17.060

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Sec. 34.17.020.
Judicial actions.

An action affecting a conservation easement may be brought by

an owner of an interest in the real property burdened by the easement;

a holder of the easement;

a person having a third-party right of enforcement; or

a person authorized by other law.

AS

34.17.010

—

34.17.060

do not affect the power of a court to modify or terminate a conservation easement under the principles of law and equity.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008, under § 5, ch. 116, SLA 2008 “AS

34.17.010

—

34.17.060

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Sec. 34.17.030.
Validity.

A conservation easement is valid even though

it is not appurtenant to an interest in real property;

it can be or has been assigned to another holder;

it is not of a character that has been recognized traditionally at common law;

it imposes a negative burden;

it imposes affirmative obligations upon the owner of an interest in the burdened property or upon the holder;

the benefit does not touch or concern real property; or

there is no privity of estate or of contract.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1989)

Sec. 34.17.040.
Applicability.

AS

34.17.010

—

34.17.060

apply to an interest created on or after May 31, 1989 that complies with AS

34.17.010

—

34.17.060

, whether designated as a conservation easement or as a covenant, equitable servitude, restriction, easement, or otherwise.

AS

34.17.010

—

34.17.060

apply to an interest created before May 31, 1989 if the interest would have been enforceable if it had been created after May 31, 1989 unless the retroactive application contravenes the constitution or laws of the state or the United States.

AS

34.17.010

—

34.17.060

do not invalidate an interest, whether designated as a conservation or preservation easement or as a covenant, equitable servitude, restriction, easement, or otherwise, that is enforceable under the law of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008, under § 5, ch. 116, SLA 2008 “AS

34.17.010

—

34.17.060

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Sec. 34.17.050.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This chapter shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the laws with respect to the subject of the chapter among states enacting it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1989)

Sec. 34.17.055.
Tort immunity from personal injuries or death arising out of the use of land subject to a conservation easement.

In addition to the immunity provided by AS

09.65.200

, an owner of land, a portion of which is subject to a conservation easement that is 50 feet or less in width, that has been granted to and accepted by the state or a municipality, and that provides public access for recreational purposes on the land subject to the conservation easement is not liable in tort, except for an act or omission that constitutes gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct, for damages to a person who uses the easement to enter onto or remain on the land if

the person had no responsibility to compensate the owner for the person’s use of the easement or the land; and

the damages arise out of the person’s use of the easement for recreational purposes on the land.

The immunity under (a) of this section extends to the grantee of the conservation easement providing public access to the land for recreational purposes.

History.

(§ 4 ch 94 SLA 1999)

Collateral references. —

What constitutes, and remedies for, misuse of easement.
111 ALR5th 313.

Sec. 34.17.060.
Definitions.

In AS

34.17.010

—

34.17.060

,

“conservation easement” means a nonpossessory interest of a holder in real property imposing limitations or affirmative obligations to retain or protect natural, scenic, or open space values of real property, ensure its availability for agricultural, forest, recreational, or open space use, protect natural resources, maintain or enhance air or water quality, or preserve the historical, architectural, archaeological, or cultural aspects of real property;

“holder” means

a governmental body empowered to hold an interest in real property under the laws of the state or the United States; or

a nonprofit corporation, charitable corporation, charitable association, or charitable trust exempted from taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) and empowered to retain or protect the natural, scenic, or open space values of real property, ensure the availability of real property for agricultural, forest, recreational, or open space use, protect natural resources, maintain or enhance air or water quality, or preserve the historical, architectural, archaeological, or cultural aspects of real property;

“third-party right of enforcement” means a right provided in a conservation easement to enforce any of its terms granted to a governmental body, nonprofit corporation, charitable corporation, charitable association, or charitable trust that is not a holder.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2008, under § 5, ch. 116, SLA 2008 “AS

34.17.010

—

34.17.060

” was substituted for “this chapter”.